Mississippi, session 2026, SB2426.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. (1)  The State Veterans Affairs Board ("Board") shall maintain the Mississippi Veterans Suicide Prevention Lifeline program created herein. (2)  In maintaining the program, the activities of the Board shall include: (a)  Working with and supporting crisis centers across the State for providing suicide prevention and mental health crisis intervention services for veterans, including appropriate follow-up services, to veterans seeking help at any time, day or night; (b)  Maintaining a suicide and mental health hotline for veterans to link callers to local emergency, mental health and social services resources.  Such hotline shall be staffed by veterans trained to assist in mental health crises; (c)  Improving awareness of the program for suicide prevention and mental health crisis intervention services for veterans in Mississippi, including by conducting an awareness initiative on social media and online, as well as ongoing outreach to the public; and (d)  Improving the collection and analysis of demographic information, in a manner that protects personal privacy, consistent with applicable Federal and State privacy laws, in order to understand disparities in access to the program among veterans who are seeking help. (3)  (a)  For the purpose of maintaining the suicide prevention hotline for veterans, the Board shall develop and implement a plan to ensure the provision of high-quality services. (b)  The plan required by paragraph (a) shall include the following: (i)  Program evaluation, including performance measures to assess progress toward the goals and objectives of the program and to improve the responsiveness and performance of the hotline. (ii)  Requirements that call takers must meet to ensure that each telephone call and applicable other communication received by the hotline is answered in a timely manner by a veteran trained to assist other veterans in mental health crises, consistent with evidence-based guidance or other guidance or best practices, as appropriate.  Such requirements shall be developed in conjunction with the Department of Health. (c)  Specific recommendations for implementing evidence-based practices, including with respect to follow-up conversations and communicating the availability of resources in the State for individuals in need. (d)  Criteria for carrying out periodic testing of the hotline during each fiscal year to identify and address any problems in a timely manner. (4)  The Board shall complete development of the initial plan and make such plan publicly available not later than December 1, 2026, and update such plan and make the updated plan publicly available periodically thereafter. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.